Vermont statutes. Title 12 Court Procedure
Subchapter 4. Subsequent Attaching Creditors

§ 3331.
Subsequent attaching creditors of real or personal property permitted to defend.

When a subsequent attaching creditor of real or personal property wishes to contest the validity of the debt or claim on which a previous attachment is founded, the court before whom the process is returnable, on which the previous attachment was made, in its discretion, may permit such subsequent attaching creditor to appear by himself or herself or counsel and defend such action.
The words “attaching creditor” shall include creditors claiming to hold by trustee process personal property or funds in the hands of any person against such previous attachments.

§ 3332.
Admissions of defendant.

When a creditor has so appeared, an admission or declaration in writing or otherwise, afterwards made by the debtor in the cause, of the validity of the claim on which such previous attachment is founded, shall not be given in evidence against such creditor nor shall he or she be affected thereby.

§ 3333.
Costs when plaintiff recovers in full.

When the plaintiff recovers final judgment for his or her whole debt or claim, he or she may have execution against such creditor for nominal damages and the costs that accrue in the cause after he or she so enters.

§ 3334.
Costs when plaintiff recovers in part.

When such creditor defeats on trial a part of the plaintiff’s claim on the ground that it is fraudulent as against creditors, he or she shall have judgment and execution against the plaintiff for such costs accrued after entry by such creditor as the court may tax in its discretion.